Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-608
Licensee; bond; conditions.

No license shall be issued under section 45-607 until the applicant has furnished a good and sufficient corporate surety bond in the sum of fifteen thousand dollars for those agencies or foreign corporations having sixteen or more licensed solicitors, ten thousand dollars for any agency having five to fifteen licensed solicitors, and five thousand dollars for any agency having less than five solicitors, payable to and approved by the board and conditioned that the licensee shall faithfully and truly perform all agreements entered into with the licensee's clients or customers and shall, within forty-five days after the close of each calendar month, report to and pay to his, her, or its client or customer the net proceeds of all collections made during the preceding calendar month and due to each client or customer, which bond shall be in such form as approved by the board and shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. No person shall be required to post a bond in excess of one hundred thousand dollars.

An action may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction upon such bond by any person to whom the licensee fails to account and pay as set forth in such bond or who has been damaged by failure of the licensee to comply with all agreements entered into with such person, except that the aggregate liability of the surety to all such persons shall, in no event, exceed the sum of such bond.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 12, p. 1597;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,169;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 8.